Utah statutes.
17B-1-605.   Budget required for certain funds -- Capital projects fund.

(1)  The budget officer of each local district shall prepare for each budget year a budget for each of the following funds:

(a)  the General Fund;

(b)  special revenue funds;

(c)  debt service funds;

(d)  capital projects funds;

(e)  proprietary funds, in accordance with Section 17B-1-629;

(f)  if the local district has a local fund, as defined in Section 53-2a-602, the local fund; and

(g)  any other fund or funds for which a budget is required by the uniform system of budgeting, accounting, and reporting.

(2) (a)  Major capital improvements financed by general obligation bonds, capital grants, or interfund transfers shall use a capital projects fund budget unless the improvements financed are to be used for proprietary type activities.

(b)  The local district shall prepare a separate budget for the term of the projects as well as the annual budget required under Subsection (1).



Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

